Tennessee, session 114, HB1321.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-2204(a)(1)(A), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
There is created in the department of tourist development a marketing division to
be under the direction of the commissioner of tourist development. The commissioner
may appoint a person to head the division, and such person shall perform all duties
regarding the division as prescribed by the commissioner.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-2204(a)(1)(B), is amended by
deleting "director" and substituting "division head".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-2204(b), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting:
The division shall:
(1) Promote new investment in the tourism industry;
(2) Provide comprehensive services to existing tourism enterprises;
(3) Promote Tennessee attractions in other states; and
(4) Distribute Tennessee informational publications.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-2209, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting:
(a) The department of tourist development is responsible for administering and
maintaining the state's welcome centers. The department of transportation shall assist
HB1321
000565
- 1 -

with maintenance of welcome center facilities as may be agreed upon by the department
of tourist development and the department of transportation.
(b)
(1) There is created in the department of tourist development a welcome
centers division to be under the direction of the commissioner of tourist
development. The commissioner may appoint a person to head the division, and
such person shall perform all duties regarding the division as prescribed by the
commissioner.
(2) The head of the welcome centers division shall oversee the welcome
centers in the state, with responsibilities that include:
(A) Promoting this state's unique heritage and attractions for
guests, through mediums such as photographs, posters, maps, music,
and books;
(B) Training staff on aspects of this state's history and area
attractions;
(C) Staffing welcome centers in accordance with department
guidelines;
(D) Maintaining welcome center facilities and grounds, including
landscaping, to provide a positive experience for guests; and
(E) Performing housekeeping activities necessary for a safe,
clean, and operable environment at such welcome center facilities.
(3) The commissioner of finance and administration shall transfer from
highway user taxes allocated to the highway fund an amount sufficient to support
the annual appropriation for implementation and administration of all welcome
centers in this state.
- 2 - 000565

SECTION 5. This act takes effect upon becoming law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 000565